Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-205
Elections; laws governing.

Propositions submitted to a vote of the people under sections 80-203 and 80-204 shall be submitted in like manner on the ballot as under the general initiative and referendum law.

Laws 1919, c. 254, § 5, p. 1032;

C.S.1922, § 6816;

C.S.1929, § 80-205;

R.S.1943, § 80-205.